Louisiana, session 2026, SB507.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:13 and 3996(B)(92) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§13. Student enrollment status; determination of nonenrollment due to
incarceration or unknown whereabouts
A.(1) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish a uniform and standardized process for city, parish, and other local
public school systems to determine and document when a student shall be
considered nonenrolled due to incarceration or unknown whereabouts.
(2) The process to document nonenrollment shall require the school
systems to make documented, reasonable, and good-faith efforts to locate the
student and verify the student's enrollment status prior to making a
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1469 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 507
determination pursuant to this Section.
(3) The nonenrollment process shall include but not be limited to
minimum documentation requirements, timelines, and verification procedures
to ensure consistency and accuracy in reporting across all city, parish, and other
local public school systems.
B.(1) If, according to the nonenrollment process, a student is determined
to be nonenrolled due to incarceration or unknown whereabouts, then the
student shall not be considered enrolled for purposes of the school and district
accountability system, pursuant to R.S. 17:10.1, as of the date of that
determination.
(2) The determination of the status of such students shall be consistent
with applicable federal law, including the Every Student Succeeds Act, 20
U.S.C. 6301 et seq., and related federal regulations and guidance.
C. The provisions of this Section are intended to ensure accurate student
enrollment reporting and accountability determinations by establishing
consistent and verifiable procedures for identifying when a student is no longer
considered enrolled in a public school system after documented efforts have
been made to locate the student.
D. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, to
implement the provisions of this Section.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and except as
may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a charter school
established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and its approved
charter and the school's officers and employees shall be exempt from all statutory mandates
or other statutory requirements that are applicable to public schools and to public school
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1469 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 507
officers and employees except for the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools
with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Student enrollment status, R.S. 17:13.
* * *